ServerSide/Hunspell/quh_BO/quh_BO.dic
achijyakanpuy/V
achninakuy/V
achuray/V
ajllapayachiy/V
ajtunakuy/V
akarichiy/V
alkansanpuy/V
allicharikuy/V
allpaririy/V
allwiysiy/V
amiykukuy/V
anchhikamuy/V
ankuyachipuy/V
ansaqekuy/V
apakanpuy/V
aqhallay/V
arawirichiy/V
arinsakamuy/V
armarikuy/V
arwiriy/V
asiykukuy/V
asuchikuy/V
atikaripuy/V
awakipakamuy/V
awaykupuy/V
ayachukuysichiy/V
ayayupachipuy/V
aymurariy/V
ayparipuy/V
aysakuy/V
ayñakapuy/V
añayñillay/V
ch'ajllallay/V
ch'akayamuy/V
ch'allinpuy/V
ch'anqapuy/V
ch'aqepuy/V
ch'arkirimuy/V
ch'arwiriy/V
ch'away/V
ch'añarayaysiy/V
ch'ijtachimuy/V
ch'illpikuy/V
ch'inkillayallay/V
ch'iqenpuy/V
ch'irminpuy/V
ch'isñirikuy/V
ch'itititirikuy/V
ch'ojmincharimuy/V
ch'ojñiyariy/V
ch'ullaykachachikuy/V
ch'umaykuy/V
ch'uqochikuy/V
ch'usarimuy/V
ch'usurimuy/V
ch'uwanchay/V
ch'uyayakanpuy/V
ch'uñuchiy/V
chajllichikapuy/V
chajnachipuy/V
chakapapuy/V
challwachiy/V
chamawsikuy/V
chaninchachimuy/V
chankaykacharichiy/V
chapaqayakanpuy/V
chapiparichiy/V
chaqnakapuy/V
charpaykachakapuy/V
chawpichakuy/V
chaypachiy/V
chhachuyakuy/V
chhajrakuy/V
chhallayallay/V
chhallukuy/V
chhankapayay/V
chhapchaykachapuy/V
chhapuyapuy/V
chhasapuy/V
chhichapuy/V
chhillariy/V
chhitay/V
chhurunakuy/V
chichillanpuy/V
chijchipayachipuy/V
chijllupayachiy/V
chillchirimuy/V
chinparipuy/V
chiparipuy/V
chirapay/V
chirmachikuy/V
chiwichiwichimuy/V
choqachiy/V
chuchulluyay/V
chukukuy/V
chullchullay/V
chulluripuy/V
chunkunakanpuy/V
chuqallay/V
churatarichiy/V
churkuykuy/V
ichhuyachipuy/V
ijikuy/V
illanakuy/V
inqhanakuy/V
intupayaysiy/V
iqhaykukuy/V
iskuchipuy/V
ithurachipuy/V
ituwakuy/V
jach'ichiy/V
jak'uchakanpuy/V
jallch'ukullay/V
jallp'ichimuy/V
jamuchipuy/V
jamut'akuy/V
janancharimuy/V
jank'akipaysiy/V
janllarayaripuy/V
janpunakuy/V
janqochapuy/V
janyallayaripuy/V
jap'inkullay/V
japhrayakanpuy/V
jaqekuy/V
jaratapuy/V
jark'anpuy/V
jat'allikamuy/V
jawachikuy/V
jawch'ayakamuy/V
jawkakamuy/V
jayaqeykukuy/V
jaylliripuy/V
jayruripuy/V
jaytarariy/V
jayñimuy/V
jich'anpuy/V
jillp'unpuy/V
jinch'aykukuy/V
jip'iykukuy/V
jiq'eqaykuy/V
jiwiqaykuy/V
juchachachiy/V
jullaqachimuy/V
jumiwakapuy/V
junt'allay/V
junuk'anakuy/V
jupt'anakuy/V
juqarichikuy/V
jusk'achikuy/V
jutuchimuy/V
juypachipuy/V
juñillay/V
k'achanpaysiy/V
k'ajmachikuy/V
k'allmachimuy/V
k'anananachimuy/V
k'ancharipuy/V
k'arariy/V
k'arpuyaykukuy/V
k'askarachiy/V
k'atatatamuy/V
k'aywinakuy/V
k'ikunakuy/V
k'illpinpuy/V
k'intillay/V
k'irawcharichiy/V
k'irinchay/V
k'isakanpuy/V
k'iskiyanpuy/V
k'isñimuy/V
k'uchiykachariy/V
k'ulluchay/V
k'umurayamuy/V
k'unkumuy/V
k'upanakuy/V
k'urpayarikuy/V
k'uytuchikamuy/V
kachamuy/V
kachinchakuy/V
kachiyakuy/V
kallkuchillay/V
kallpanchachipuy/V
kamamarichiy/V
kanchachimuy/V
kapuy/V
karp'achipuy/V
kasarachiy/V
kawchukachikuy/V
kawpullay/V
khachayakamuy/V
khachuykachamuy/V
khakayapuy/V
khallkanakuy/V
khamanpuy/V
khanananay/V
khapaykachachikuy/V
khapuykukuy/V
kharkaykuy/V
khashtuykuy/V
khawaysiy/V
khipuchikuy/V
khitukapuy/V
khuchincharimuy/V
khuskacharipuy/V
khuskiy/V
khutuyachikuy/V
kichachikuy/V
killaririkuy/V
kimsacharikuy/V
kinchay/V
kirpararichiy/V
kukupakanpuy/V
kullaykukuy/V
kullunkaysiy/V
kuntuysiy/V
kusachikuy/V
kusiykuchikuy/V
kutakipachipuy/V
kutututullay/V
laq'amuy/V
laqheripuy/V
layqay/V
llachiysiy/V
llajt'uchiy/V
llallichimuy/V
llankhakanpuy/V
llanpakanpuy/V
llant'ayarimuy/V
llaphiyapuy/V
llaq'apakanpuy/V
llaqayakapuy/V
llasllanpuy/V
llawch'imuy/V
llawq'epuy/V
llijch'achimuy/V
llik'ichimuy/V
llikuysiy/V
llinqochipuy/V
lliojyachipuy/V
lliqheripuy/V
llirqorikuy/V
llojllarikamuy/V
llojt'arichikuy/V
lluk'iykukuy/V
llullmiriy/V
llunk'uchikuy/V
llup'ichikuy/V
llusichiy/V
llust'ichikuy/V
luluchimuy/V
machachikuy/V
machuyapurichiy/V
majllakullay/V
mak'ayachikuy/V
mallikanpuy/V
mallmachiy/V
mamurikuy/V
manchariysiy/V
manuchikuy/V
maphachakapuy/V
marq'amuy/V
mast'akuy/V
mat'unakuy/V
mawk'ayamuy/V
mayt'urikuy/V
mañaqanpuy/V
michinpuy/V
mikhunpuy/V
millmannarikuy/V
millupuy/V
miniripuy/V
miq'ayarichiy/V
mirariy/V
misk'arichiy/V
mismichipuy/V
mitmachikapuy/V
mojminakuy/V
mojunchamuy/V
muchuykukuy/V
mukay/V
mullmupuy/V
munapahkunpuy/V
muqaykukuy/V
murq'achikuy/V
musinakuy/V
musojchanakuy/V
musqocharikuy/V
mut'irimuy/V
muyuchay/V
muyuyaripuy/V
napaykachachimuy/V
naqeyamuy/V
ninapuy/V
nunachakamuy/V
onqokuy/V
p'achallikuy/V
p'ajchiripuy/V
p'akiykukuy/V
p'anaykukuy/V
p'anpaykuy/V
p'aqayarichiy/V
p'arwarikuy/V
p'atmarimuy/V
p'enqaysichiy/V
p'ikapuy/V
p'itamuy/V
p'ojruyanpuy/V
p'unchawyarichiy/V
p'unruyay/V
p'ushqoykukuy/V
pajtachachimuy/V
pallqachikuy/V
pallwachimuy/V
panpachachimuy/V
pantakuy/V
parapuy/V
parlarikuy/V
parwaysiy/V
patachachipuy/V
pawikamuy/V
payllamuy/V
phajsariysiy/V
phanchichikuy/V
pharpachipuy/V
phaskichiy/V
phawaykachakuy/V
phinkipuy/V
phishqacharichiy/V
phiñapayachipuy/V
phojllarimuy/V
phukurimuy/V
phullpuripuy/V
phurunchariy/V
phusullullakamuy/V
phutirayarimuy/V
pichamuy/V
pijchunakuy/V
pilanakuy/V
pinchachanpuy/V
pipuyaykuy/V
pirutuchikuy/V
pisipachimuy/V
pitkakamuy/V
pitwikanpuy/V
puchukuy/V
pukarallay/V
pullpunakuy/V
pumay/V
punkiy/V
puqoykuy/V
purunyarikuy/V
pusarikuy/V
q'achirimuy/V
q'ajwaripuy/V
q'allpiriy/V
q'anpariy/V
q'apñuy/V
q'asay/V
q'atachaykukuy/V
q'aymarayachikuy/V
q'echachiy/V
q'ellichipuy/V
q'elluyaykuy/V
q'enpiriy/V
q'ensikamuy/V
q'epnachipuy/V
q'eshwanpuy/V
q'ewakanakuy/V
q'ewiray/V
q'olltichimuy/V
q'omirayamuy/V
q'oshñikiparichikuy/V
q'owakamuy/V
q'oñiysichiy/V
qallarichimuy/V
qallqachipuy/V
qamayarimuy/V
qanchiripuy/V
qapachay/V
qaranchanakuy/V
qarpachiy/V
qasakapuy/V
qawikapuy/V
qayllakuy/V
qechurimuy/V
qelqachipuy/V
qemllaykuysiy/V
qesachachipuy/V
qhachirichiy/V
qhallallarimuy/V
qhanparmanarimuy/V
qhaparqacharikuy/V
qhaqochikuy/V
qhashqachikanpuy/V
qhastimuy/V
qhatapuy/V
qhatipayarimuy/V
qhawapayachimuy/V
qhechinchaykuy/V
qhelqaysiy/V
qhepanchapuy/V
qhochukanpuy/V
qholluqayarichiy/V
qhonñirikuy/V
qhoraripuy/V
qhoruripuy/V
qhoysuriy/V
qollpamuy/V
qolqechanpuy/V
qonchuchapuy/V
qonqarikuy/V
qoqaparichiy/V
qorinchanpuy/V
qorpayarichiy/V
rachapanakuy/V
rajthayapuy/V
rakhuyarimuy/V
rank'ariy/V
rankuysiy/V
rantiy/V
rapt'achimuy/V
rarq'achachiy/V
rat'annakanpuy/V
rawkhakanpuy/V
raykukapuy/V
rijrachiy/V
rikapuy/V
rimapayamuy/V
rirpuykukuy/V
rit'iysiy/V
rojruchiy/V
ruk'ikapuy/V
rumiyamuy/V
runayarichiy/V
runtunpuy/V
ruq'apuy/V
rurupuy/V
sa'qarichiy/V
sajsaysiy/V
sallallachikuy/V
samillay/V
sanamuy/V
saniyapuy/V
sanp'ayariy/V
sansay/V
saphsayanpuy/V
sapsichanpuy/V
saqarikuy/V
sarayarimuy/V
saruy/V
sasichimuy/V
satkuyakanpuy/V
sawkachanakuy/V
sawñiripuy/V
saywariy/V
sich'ukuy/V
sijrallay/V
sijyanakuy/V
sillkunakuy/V
silluyaripuy/V
simiwanñikanpuy/V
sink'ullay/V
sinqachipuy/V
sinrichipuy/V
sinñichipuy/V
sipasyakamuy/V
siptikanpuy/V
siq'okuy/V
siqeyakamuy/V
sirichinakuy/V
sirpakay/V
sisikanpuy/V
sit'ukapuy/V
sojsukanpuy/V
suachiy/V
suk'unpakanpuy/V
sullakapuy/V
sumajchakanpuy/V
sumaychapaysiy/V
sunqochariy/V
supayay/V
suq'aykuy/V
surk'aykuy/V
suskhuchimuy/V
sut'inchachikuy/V
sutichachimuy/V
suyarikuy/V
suyuchariy/V
t'ajllarakamuy/V
t'ajsaykuy/V
t'ajwiy/V
t'aphsallay/V
t'astaykuy/V
t'ijt'ijñichimuy/V
t'illayakamuy/V
t'inpikuy/V
t'ipkichiy/V
t'irincharimuy/V
t'iuchiy/V
t'ojtuykuy/V
t'ullkuripuy/V
t'urpuy/V
t'ustiriy/V
tajyaykukuy/V
takurarimuy/V
taphrakapuy/V
tarpachipuy/V
tawak'uchuchakamuy/V
thalariy/V
thansachiy/V
thasnuchimuy/V
thitachipuy/V
thunkirimuy/V
tiaripuy/V
tijtiykukuy/V
tipkachipuy/V
tojtukamuy/V
tullpuchikuy/V
tunkichiy/V
turiyachimuy/V
tutikamuy/V
ujllachipuy/V
ullphurikamuy/V
umapatachikuy/V
unachaykuy/V
unqonakuy/V
upatukuriy/V
uqonakuy/V
urqhochimuy/V
usaysiy/V
usnuripuy/V
usupuy/V
uyakanakuy/V
uykurikuy/V
uyñirikuy/V
wajrayachikuy/V
wallpallay/V
wananchanpuy/V
wankharimuy/V
wanqanpuy/V
wap'uykuy/V
warak'achimuy/V
warmarimullay/V
wasichakanpuy/V
watinkaysiy/V
wawachay/V
wayllunk'arichiy/V
wayrakacharipuy/V
waywaysiy/V
wichichichikanpuy/V
wijsunakuy/V
williwallay/V
wipachikapuy/V
wirukanpuy/V
wisqakuy/V
wiñakamuy/V
yakapuy/V
yanapakapuy/V
yanukuy/V
yaqollakanpuy/V
yawyachikuy/V
yukuykukuy/V
yuqoykuy/V
ñajch'aykukuy/V
ñarñakuy/V
ñawrayakanpuy/V
ñirichiy/V
ñup'uchakamuy/V
